North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-18.2 County Nursing Homes [Repealed]

23-18.2-01.
Declaration of legislative policy and purpose. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 2; 1991, ch. 54, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-03.
Creation of nursing home authority by election. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 3; 1985, ch. 235, § 54; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-04.
Commissioners of authority — Appointment, compensation, qualifications, tenure. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 4; 1997, ch. 432, § 14; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-05.
Officers of authority, election — Quorum. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 5; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-06.
Power of commissioners of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 6; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-07.
Employees of authority — Duty of state’s attorney — Legal assistants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-08.
Commissioner or employee may not have interest in nursing home or property to be used. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-09.
Removal of commissioners. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 9; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-10.
Powers and duties of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-11.
Authority may contract with private nursing homes for services. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 11; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-12.
Tax levy may be certified by nursing home authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 12; 1983, ch. 593, § 18; 1983, ch. 606, § 32; repealed by 2015, sb2144, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-13.
Rentals to be at lowest possible rate — Authority not to be operated for profit. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 13; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-14.
Rentals — How fixed by authority — Use of rental fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 14; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-15.
Planning, zoning, and building laws. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 15; repealed by 2015, sb2144, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-16.
Bonds — Type which may be issued. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 16; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-17.
Bonds — Issued pursuant to resolution — General provisions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 17; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-18.
Bonds — Liability — Tax exempt. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 18; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-19.
Sale of bonds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 19; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-20.
Bonds — Validity when officer who signs bond is no longer in office — Deemed issued for housing project. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 20; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-21.
Provisions of bonds and trust indentures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 21; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-22.
Certification of attorney general as to legality of bonds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 22; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-23.
Rights and remedies of an obligee of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 23; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-24.
Additional remedies conferrable by authority on obligee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 24; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-25.
Exemption of real property from execution sale. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 25; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-26.
Tax exemptions and payments in lieu of taxes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 26; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-27.
Reports. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 27; 1979, ch. 553, § 13; 1983, ch. 570, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-28.
Municipalities may cooperate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 28; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

23-18.2-29.
Cooperation between authorities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 230, § 29; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.